Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.44
Building materials, defined.

Building materials means any property that will be annexed to real estate or to an improvement on real estate. Building materials does not include tools, supplies, or property that will not be annexed.

Laws 2004, LB 1017, § 4.